Hawaii, session 2026, SB2692.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the 62.576‑acre parcel identified as tax map key:  (3) 2-1-001:012 is currently the site of the Grand Naniloa Golf Course.  The legislature further finds that the redevelopment of this parcel to more beneficial uses is in the public interest. The parcel is an important component of the Banyan Drive resort area, and its current use as a golf course does not fulfill the land's potential to benefit the surrounding area and broader community. The State, through the department of land and natural resources, owns the land on which this parcel is located.  The department of land and natural resources desires to redevelop the area based on the needs and desires of the community. This parcel is currently leased to a private entity as part of the Grand Naniloa Hotel, pursuant to General Lease No. S‑5844.  To redevelop this area, the privately held leasehold interest in the golf course must be acquired by agreement, withdrawal from the lease, or eminent domain, which would require the payment of fair or just compensation to the lessee. The legislature hereby supports the acquisition of the leasehold interest in the parcel currently used as the Grand Naniloa Golf Course, whether by agreement, withdrawal, or eminent domain. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Authorize the department of land and natural resources to acquire, through eminent domain or otherwise, the leasehold interest in the parcel identified as tax map key:  (3) 2‑1‑001:012 and currently used as the Grand Naniloa Golf Course; (2)  Authorize the board of land and natural resources to approve a new use for the parcel after providing the public an opportunity to provide testimony; and (3)  Appropriate moneys to the department of land and natural resources. SECTION 2. (a)  The department of land and natural resources may acquire the leasehold interest in the parcel identified as tax map key:  (3) 2‑1‑001:012 and currently used as the Grand Naniloa Golf Course, whether by agreement, withdrawal, or eminent domain pursuant to chapter 101, Hawaii Revised Statutes. (b) After acquiring the leasehold interest pursuant to subsection (a), the board of land and natural resources may approve a new use for the parcel in an open meeting that complies with part I of chapter 92, Hawaii Revised Statutes; provided that the board first provides the public the opportunity to provide testimony on any proposed new uses of the parcel. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $270,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of land and natural resources to acquire the leasehold interest in the parcel of state-owned land identified in section 2 of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________